test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV_REP-0i-nagudiitlod_jump-down.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - nàgudiitłod[jump-down] :
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg1:       [nìnágudistłiizh, nànágudistłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg2:       [nìnágudíítłiizh, nànágudíítłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg3:       [nìnágudiitłiizh, nànágudiitłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl1:       [nìnágudiìtłiizh, nìnágudaàtłiizh, nànágudiìtłiizh, nànágudaàtłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl1+Distr: [nìnádàgudiìtłiizh, nìnádàgudaàtłiizh, nànádàgudiìtłiizh, nànádàgudaàtłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl2:       [nìnágudastłiizh, nànágudastłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl2+Distr: [nìnádàgudastłiizh, nànádàgudastłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl3:       [nìnágugidiitłiizh, nànágugidiitłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl3+Distr: [nìnádàgugidiitłiizh, nànádàgugidiitłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg4:       [nìnáguts'idiitłiizh, nànáguts'idiitłiizh]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg4+Distr: [nìnádàguts'idiitłiizh, nànádàguts'idiitłiizh]
